Oklahoma, session 2026, SB155.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the State Department


of Health from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the


General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year


ending June 30, 2023, the sum of One Million One Hundred Thousand


Dollars ($1,100,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary for


the purpose of administering a public information campaign regarding


diabetes care and free or reduced-price diabetes supplies.


SECTION 2. There is hereby appropriated to the State Department


of Health from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the


General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year


ending June 30, 2023, the sum of Three Hundred Forty Thousand Two


Hundred Twenty-two Dollars ($340,222.00) to be administered to



Req. No. 678 Page 1


federally qualified health centers as such term is defined pursuant


to Section 1-747.2 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-678 CAD 12/30/2024 11:30:15 AM































Req. No. 678 Page 2